Louisiana, session 2025s1, SB1.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part I-B of Chapter 5 of Title 18 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 18:419.1 and 419.2, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART I-B. SPECIAL PROVISIONS FOR
CERTAIN ELECTIONS HELD IN 2026
§419.1. Applicability of Part
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
provisions contained in this Part shall be applicable in 2026 to the spring
elections for municipal and ward officers, for candidates in a party primary
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 251ES-6 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 1
election for a party primary office, and for other elections held at the same time.
It is the intent of the Legislature of Louisiana that the spring primary election
occur on May 16, 2026, instead of April 18, 2026, and that the spring general
election occur on June 27, 2026, instead of May 30, 2026. All other dates and
deadlines related to the spring elections as provided for in this Code and not
otherwise specifically provided for in this Part shall be calculated based upon
the dates provided for in this Part.
§419.2. Spring elections in 2026
A. Notwithstanding R.S. 18:402(C)(1) or 410.10 or any other provision
of law to the contrary, the following dates shall apply for the spring elections in
2026:
(1) There shall be a spring primary election held on May 16, 2026, for
municipal and ward officers elected in the spring of a nonpresidential
congressional election year and for candidates in a party primary election for
a party primary office to be elected in that year. Any contest, proposition,
question, or constitutional amendment scheduled to appear on the ballot for the
April 18, 2026, election shall instead appear on the ballot for the May 16, 2026,
election.
(2) There shall be a spring general election held on June 27, 2026, for
municipal and ward officers and, if necessary, a second party primary for
candidates in a party primary election for a party primary office to be elected
that year. Any contest, proposition, or question scheduled to appear on the
ballot for the May 30, 2026, election shall instead appear on the ballot for the
June 27, 2026, election.
B.(1) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:467 or any other provision of law to the
contrary, the qualifying period for candidates for the spring primary election
in 2026 and for all candidates for a party primary office to be elected in 2026,
and those in any special primary election to be held at the same time, shall open
on February 11, 2026.
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 251ES-6 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 1
(2)(a) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:410.5 and 465(B) or any other provision
of law to the contrary, any signature collected on or after September 16, 2025,
on a nominating petition for an office for which qualifying opens on February
11, 2026, shall be considered timely.
(b) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:465(C)(3)(b), the number of qualified voters
who must timely sign a nominating petition for a candidate for United States
representative in Congress to be elected in 2026, is seven hundred fifty from
within the state.
(c) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:465(C)(1), the number of qualified voters
who must timely sign a nominating petition for a candidate for United States
senator to be elected in 2026, is two thousand five hundred from within the
state.
C.(1) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:1491.6(B)(1), each committee which is
participating in the election of a candidate for major office in the May 16, 2026,
election, excluding a candidate for party primary office, shall file a report as
required by R.S. 18:1491.6 no later than November 20, 2025, which shall be
complete through the one hundred ninetieth day prior to the May 16, 2026,
election. However, it shall not be a violation of Chapter 11 of this Title for a
committee to fail to file such a report prior to November 20, 2025.
(2) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:1495.4(B)(1), each candidate for major office
in the May 16, 2026, election, excluding a candidate for party primary office,
shall file a report as required by R.S. 18:1495.4 no later than November 20,
2025, which shall be complete through the one hundred ninetieth day prior to
the May 16, 2026, election. However, it shall not be a violation of Chapter 11 of
this Title for a candidate to fail to file such a report prior to November 20, 2025.
(3) A candidate who is required to file a supplemental report by
February 15, 2026, pursuant to R.S. 18:1495.4(D)(3)(b) shall instead file the
supplemental report by March 2, 2026.
(4) A candidate who is required to file an annual report by February 15,
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 251ES-6 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 1
2026, pursuant to R.S. 18:1495.4(E) shall instead file the annual report by
March 2, 2026.
D.(1) The secretary of state may make necessary changes to any rules,
regulations, forms, instructions, statements, ballots, nominating petitions, early
voting ballot instructions, or absentee by mail ballot envelopes, instructions,
certificates, or other balloting paraphernalia to reflect the dates and deadlines
provided for in this Part without approval as otherwise required by R.S. 18:18,
423, 431, 552, or 1306.
(2) The secretary of state may proceed with emergency rulemaking
pursuant to R.S. 49:962 if necessary to implement the provisions of this Part.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.